Massachusetts, session 194th, H3653.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “not more than $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense.” the following new paragraph:-
On or after January 1, 2028, a motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or semi-trailer unit
classified as a class 3 or above by the Federal Highway Administration, with a gross vehicle
weight rating of 10,001 pounds or more, shall be equipped with a lateral protective device,
convex mirrors, crossover mirrors and backup cameras if the vehicle was operated under a
contract with or leased or purchased by the following entities:
Any municipality of the Commonwealth;
Any instrumentality of the Commonwealth;
Any “electric company” as defined in section 1 of chapter 164;
Any “gas company” as defined in section 1 of chapter 164;
of 2

Any “utility” as defined in section 25A of chapter 166; or
Any “wireless provider” as defined in section 25A of chapter 166.
This paragraph shall not apply to an ambulance, firefighting apparatus, low-speed
vehicle, agricultural tractor or any other class or type of vehicle as determined by the registrar.
The registrar shall adopt regulations establishing standards, consistent with the United States
Department of Transportation John A. Volpe National Transportation Systems Center’s side
guard standard DOT-VNTSC-OSTR-16-05, and specifications for the size, design and mounting
of lateral protective devices, convex mirrors and cross-over mirrors. The registrar may provide
alternative means of compliance with the convex mirror, cross-over mirror and lateral protective
device requirements.
of 2